Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-614
President; petition candidates or
advocated or recognized candidates; placing on ballot; affidavit of rejection
of candidacy; purged candidate, when.

The names of persons
in the political party (1) who are presented by petition of their supporters
to be party candidates for President of the United States or (2) who have
been determined by the Secretary of State to be generally advocated or recognized
as candidates in national news media throughout the United States shall be
printed on the primary election ballot for the office of President of the
United States. This section
does not apply if the political party dissolves as provided in subsection
(2) of section 32-720.

If a person
does not want his or her name on the Nebraska primary election ballot, he
or she shall, by March 10 of the presidential election year, execute and file
an affidavit with the Secretary of State stating without qualification that
he or she is not now and does not intend to become a candidate for office
of President of the United States at the next presidential election in Nebraska
or any other state. If a presidential candidate files such affidavit removing
his or her name and subsequently becomes a presidential candidate in another
state, the candidate's affidavit in Nebraska shall be purged and shall have
no force and effect. The Secretary of State shall then place such candidate's
name on the primary election ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 182;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 60;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 4.